Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,155
Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment; registration fee.

For the registration of well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment, the registration fee shall be one-twelfth of the regular commercial registration fee as determined by gross vehicle weight. Such fee shall be collected and distributed in the same manner as other motor vehicle fees.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 155.